Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.070

Compensation of assistants, attorneys, and employees.

Subject to any collective bargaining agreement, the attorney general shall fix the compensation of all assistants, attorneys, and employees, and in the event they are assigned to any department, board, or commission, such department, board, or commission shall pay the compensation as fixed by the attorney general, not however in excess of the amount made available to the department by law for legal services.

[ 2019 c 145 s 5; 1965 c 8 s 43.10.070. Prior: 1941 c 50 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 11034-3, part.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 145: See note following RCW 41.80.400.